test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-tjaahppat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - tjáhppat: # A_TJAAHPPAT

    tjáhppat+A+Attr: tjähppis

    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhppat
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Nom: tjáhppada

#    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Gen: tjáhppada
#    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Acc: tjáhppadav
#    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ill: tjáhppadij
#    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ine: tjáhppadin
#    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ela: [tjáhppadist, tjáhppadis]
#    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Com: tjáhppadijn
#    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Gen: tjáhppadij
#    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Acc: tjáhppadijd
#    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ill: tjáhppadijda
#    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ine: tjáhppadijn
#    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ela: [tjáhppadijst, tjáhppadijs]
#    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Com: [tjáhppadij, tjáhppadijgum]
##    tjáhppat+A+Ess: tjáhppadin

    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Attr: tjáhppadup

    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjáhppadup
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [tjáhppadubo, tjáhppaduba]

#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: tjáhppadubo
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: tjáhppadubov
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: tjáhppaduboj
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: tjáhppadubon
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: [tjáhppadubost, tjáhppadubos]
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [tjáhppadubojn, tjáhppadubojna]
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: tjáhppaduboj
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: tjáhppadubojd
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: tjáhppadubojda
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: tjáhppadubojn
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: [tjáhppadubojst, tjáhppadubojs]
#    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [tjáhppaduboj, tjáhppadubojgum]
##    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Ess: tjáhppadubon


    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Attr: tjáhppadumos

    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjáhppadumos
    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: tjáhppadubmusa

#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: tjáhppadubmusa
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: tjáhppadubmusav
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: tjáhppadubmusij
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: tjáhppadubmusin
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [tjáhppadubmusist, tjáhppadubmusis]
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Sg+Com: tjáhppadubmusijn
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: tjáhppadubmusij
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: tjáhppadubmusijd
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: tjáhppadubmusijda
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: tjáhppadubmusijn
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [tjáhppadubmusijst, tjáhppadubmusijs]
#    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [tjáhppadubmusij, tjáhppadubmusijgum]
##    tjáhppat+A+Superl+Ess: tjáhppadubmuson
